kjh.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>              ! morpheme boundary

%<n%>           ! Имя Существительное | Noun
%<adj%>         ! Имя Приоагательное  | Adjective
%<adv%>         ! Наречие             | Adverb
%<prn%>         ! Местоимение         | Pronoun
%<conj%>        !                     | Conjunction

%<temp%>        ! temporary, for words I don't know how to tag
%<rfl%>         ! reflexive

%<num%>         ! Имя Числительное    | Numeral
%<ord%>         ! Порядковые          | Ordinal

%<sg%>          ! единственного число  | Singular
%<pl%>          ! множественного число | Plural

%<p1%>          ! First Person
%<p2%>          ! Second Person
%<p3%>          ! Third Person

%<px1sg%>      ! 1st person singular possessive
%<px2sg%>      ! 2nd person singular possessive
%<px3sg%>      ! 3rd person singular possessive
%<px1pl%>      ! 1st person plural possessive
%<px2pl%>      ! 2nd person plural possessive
%<px3pl%>      ! 3rd person plural possessive


!--------- Cases -----------------!
%<nom%>         ! основной падеж       | nominative case
%<acc%>         ! винительный падеж    | accusitive case
%<dat%>         ! дательный падеж      | dative case
%<loc%>         ! местный падеж        | locative case
%<ins%>         ! орундийный падеж     | instrumental case NOTE: not sure if this is actually instrumental
%<abl%>         ! исходный падеж       | ablative case
%<gen%>         ! родительный падеж    | genitive case
%<all%>         ! направительный падеж | allative case
!----------------------------------!


!------------ Archiphonemes ---------------!
%{а%}           ! а е
%{ы%}           ! і ы 0
%{з%}           ! з 0
%{с%}           ! з с
%{л%}           ! л н т
%{т%}           ! н т
%{д%}           ! д т
%{d%}           ! д н т
%{н%}           ! н 0
%{х%}           ! ғ г х к 0
!------------------------------------------!

!-------------Markers--------------------!
%{px3%}         ! 3rd person possessive

%{acc%}         ! accusitive
%{loc%}         ! locative
%{all%}         ! allative
%{abl%}         ! ablative
%{dat%}         ! dative
!----------------------------------------!


LEXICON Root

Nouns      ;
Numerals   ;
!Adjectives ;
!Adverbs   ;
Pronouns   ;
Conjunctions ;

LEXICON CASE

!! NOTE: grammars collide when discussing dative case inflection
!!       here I follow the print grammar

%<nom%>:                          # ; ! nominative
%<gen%>:%>%{т%}%{ы%}ң             # ; ! genetive
%<dat%>:%>%{х%}%{а%}%{dat%}       # ; ! dative
%<acc%>:%>%{т%}%{ы%}%{acc%}       # ; ! accusitive
%<loc%>:%>%{н%}%{д%}%{а%}%{loc%}  # ; ! locative
%<abl%>:%>%{d%}%{а%}ң%{abl%}      # ; ! ablative
%<all%>:%>%{н%}%{с%}%{а%}р%{all%} # ; ! allative
%<ins%>:%>н%{а%}ң                 # ; ! instrumental

LEXICON CASE-WITHOUT-DAT

!! NOTE: grammars collide when discussing dative case inflection
!!       here I follow the print grammar

%<nom%>:                          # ; ! nominative
%<gen%>:%>%{т%}%{ы%}ң             # ; ! genetive
%<acc%>:%>%{т%}%{ы%}%{acc%}       # ; ! accusitive
%<loc%>:%>%{н%}%{д%}%{а%}%{loc%}  # ; ! locative
%<abl%>:%>%{d%}%{а%}ң%{abl%}      # ; ! ablative
%<all%>:%>%{н%}%{с%}%{а%}р%{all%} # ; ! allative
%<ins%>:%>н%{а%}ң                 # ; ! instrumental

LEXICON POSSESSIVE

! NOTE: online grammar says px3pl should be {л}{а}р{і}
!            unless it follows plural suffix, in which case it is {і}
!       print grammar says it should be {з}{і} (same as px3sg)
!       here I follow the rule from the print grammar

                              CASE ; ! ¬ possessive
%<px1sg%>:%>%{ы%}м            CASE ; ! 1st person singular possessive
%<px2sg%>:%>%{ы%}ң            CASE ; ! 2nd person singular possessive
%<px3sg%>:%>%{з%}%{ы%}%{px3%} CASE ; ! 3rd person singular possessive
%<px1pl%>:%>%{ы%}б%{ы%}с      CASE ; ! 1st person plural possessive
%<px2pl%>:%>%{ы%}ң%{а%}р      CASE ; ! 2nd person plural possessive
%<px3pl%>:%>%{з%}%{ы%}%{px3%} CASE ; ! 3rd person plural possessive

LEXICON PLURAL-POSSESSIVE

%<sg%>:               POSSESSIVE ; ! ¬ plural
%<pl%>:%>%{л%}%{а%}р  POSSESSIVE ; ! plural

LEXICON PLURAL-CASE

%<sg%>:               CASE ; ! ¬ plural
%<pl%>:%>%{л%}%{а%}р  CASE ; ! plural

LEXICON PLURAL-CASE-WITHOUT-DAT

%<sg%>:               CASE-WITHOUT-DAT ; ! ¬ plural
%<pl%>:%>%{л%}%{а%}р  CASE-WITHOUT-DAT ; ! plural

LEXICON N

%<n%>: PLURAL-POSSESSIVE ;


LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: CASE    ; ! ¬ ordinal
%<num%>: ORDINAL ; ! ordinal

!LEXICON TENS

!LEXICON HUNDREDS

!LEXICON THOUSANDS

LEXICON Numerals
! this is unfinished
! need production of big numbers

!BASE

пір:пір          NUM;        ! один        | one
ікі:ікі          NUM;        ! два         | two
ӱс:ӱс            NUM;        ! три         | three
тӧрт:тӧрт        NUM;        ! четыре      | four
пис:пис          NUM;        ! пять        | five
алты:алты        NUM;        ! шесть       | six
читі:читі        NUM;        ! семь        | seven
сигіс:сигіс      NUM;        ! восемь      | eight
тоғыс:тоғыс      NUM;        ! девять      | nine

он:он            NUM;        ! десять      | ten
чибіргі:чибіргі  NUM;        ! двадцать    | twenty
отыс:отыс        NUM;        ! тридцать    | thirty
хырых:хырых      NUM;        ! сорок       | forty
иліг:иліг        NUM;        ! пятьдесят   | fifty
алтон:алтон      NUM;        ! шестьдесят  | sixty
читон:читон      NUM;        ! семьдесят   | seventy
сигізон:сигізон  NUM;        ! восемьдесят | eighty
тоғызон:тоғызон  NUM;        ! девяносто   | ninety

чӱс:чӱс          NUM;        ! сто         | (one)hundred
муң:муң          NUM;        ! тысячя      | (one)thousand

LEXICON ORDINAL

%<ord%>:%>%{ы%}нӌ%{ы%}    CASE;        ! ordinal numbers

LEXICON ADJ

%<adj%>: # ;

!LEXICON Adjectives

!хара:хара       ADJ ;   ! черный  | black
!кӧк:кӧк         ADJ ;   ! голубой | blue
!хызыл:хызыл     ADJ ;   ! красный | red
!ах:ах           ADJ ;   ! белый   | white

!LEXICON Adverbs

LEXICON Conjunctions

паза%<conj%>:паза # ; ! и | and

LEXICON Pronouns
пу%<prn%>%<temp%>%<pl%>:пулар   CASE ; ! plurals
тігі%<prn%>%<temp%>:тігі  PLURAL-CASE ; ! вот тот | this here(?)
ол%<prn%>%<temp%>%<pl%>:олар           CASE ; ! plurals
кем%<prn%>%<temp%>:кем   PLURAL-CASE ; ! кто | who
ниме%<prn%>%<temp%>:ниме PLURAL-CASE ; ! что | what
хайдағ%<prn%>%<temp%>:хайдағ PLURAL-CASE-WITHOUT-DAT ; ! какой | what kind
нинӌе%<prn%>%temp%>:нинӌе PLURAL-CASE ; ! сколько | how much
LEXICON Nouns
аба:аба	N ;
абылағ:абылағ	N ;
австриец:австриец	N ;
автопоезд:автопоезд	N ;
агропром:агропром	N ;
ағыринӌа:ағыринӌа	N ;
адресант:адресант	N ;
азымахчыл:азымахчыл	N ;
айах-хамыстығ:айах-хамыстығ	N ;
айныстығ:айныстығ	N ;
аквамарин:аквамарин	N ;
алаамзыр:алаамзыр	N ;
албах:албах	N ;
алебастр:алебастр	N ;
алтолаң:алтолаң	N ;
алыныс:алыныс	N ;
американскай:американскай	N ;
анатомия:анатомия	N ;
анонимщик:анонимщик	N ;
анымӌох:анымӌох	N ;
аппаратура:аппаратура	N ;
аразында:аразында	N ;
арбитр:арбитр	N ;
аристократ:аристократ	N ;
артхы:артхы	N ;
арых:арых	N ;
асхылдырос:асхылдырос	N ;
аттракцион:аттракцион	N ;
ахчалығ:ахчалығ	N ;
базар:базар	N ;
банк:банк	N ;
батарея:батарея	N ;
бидон:бидон	N ;
болгарка:болгарка	N ;
бром:бром	N ;
бурят:бурят	N ;
ваннай:ваннай	N ;
вермут:вермут	N ;
витамин:витамин	N ;
выговор:выговор	N ;
гауптвахта:гауптвахта	N ;
гипертония:гипертония	N ;
гостиница:гостиница	N ;
группа:группа	N ;
дебитор:дебитор	N ;
десерт:десерт	N ;
диктофон:диктофон	N ;
доход:доход	N ;
ежевика:ежевика	N ;
журналистика:журналистика	N ;
замша:замша	N ;
золотухалығ:золотухалығ	N ;
ибі-суу:ибі-суу	N ;
идінӌек:идінӌек	N ;
изірік:изірік	N ;
илег:илег	N ;
империализм:империализм	N ;
инег-чобағ:инег-чобағ	N ;
интеллигентка:интеллигентка	N ;
ипчі:ипчі	N ;
ирем-хурам:ирем-хурам	N ;
ирте:ирте	N ;
испан(ец):испан(ец)	N ;
іденгек:іденгек	N ;
ізінче:ізінче	N ;
ілініс:ілініс	N ;
іскеркі:іскеркі	N ;
іткек:іткек	N ;
кавычка:кавычка	N ;
кальций:кальций	N ;
капот:капот	N ;
кариес:кариес	N ;
касторка:касторка	N ;
квалификация:квалификация	N ;
кем-кем:кем-кем	N ;
кибір:кибір	N ;
кииктіг:кииктіг	N ;
килчӧр:килчӧр	N ;
киноартист:киноартист	N ;
киңзіг:киңзіг	N ;
киреліг:киреліг	N ;
киртіністіг:киртіністіг	N ;
китель:китель	N ;
кілег:кілег	N ;
кірлес:кірлес	N ;
классификация:классификация	N ;
кобальт:кобальт	N ;
колхозник:колхозник	N ;
комод:комод	N ;
консервативнай:консервативнай	N ;
конус:конус	N ;
коронация:коронация	N ;
кӧбігей:кӧбігей	N ;
кӧгін:кӧгін	N ;
кӧзее:кӧзее	N ;
кӧйіркеестіг:кӧйіркеестіг	N ;
кӧлбең:кӧлбең	N ;
кӧмзеленеечі:кӧмзеленеечі	N ;
кӧӧлеме:кӧӧлеме	N ;
кӧрік:кӧрік	N ;
кӧче:кӧче	N ;
криптограмма:криптограмма	N ;
кукарик:кукарик	N ;
кучер:кучер	N ;
кӱлет:кӱлет	N ;
кӱннің-таңда:кӱннің-таңда	N ;
кӱремӌік:кӱремӌік	N ;
кӱснең:кӱснең	N ;
лаборант:лаборант	N ;
ларингит:ларингит	N ;
лента:лента	N ;
линза:линза	N ;
локатор:локатор	N ;
магарыч:магарыч	N ;
майонез:майонез	N ;
мал-суғ:мал-суғ	N ;
манка:манка	N ;
марганец:марганец	N ;
маршрут:маршрут	N ;
матрёшка:матрёшка	N ;
машинист:машинист	N ;
мел:мел	N ;
металлургия:металлургия	N ;
мечеть:мечеть	N ;
миниатюра:миниатюра	N ;
модалығ:модалығ	N ;
монӌар:монӌар	N ;
мӧңіс-чабыс:мӧңіс-чабыс	N ;
мӱндӱт:мӱндӱт	N ;
наборщица:наборщица	N ;
нанӌылас:нанӌылас	N ;
натурализм:натурализм	N ;
нерге:нерге	N ;
ніскеӌек:ніскеӌек	N ;
нӱңӱр:нӱңӱр	N ;
общественнай:общественнай	N ;
ойлас:ойлас	N ;
омах:омах	N ;
оорха:оорха	N ;
оргкомитет:оргкомитет	N ;
остал:остал	N ;
ӧзек:ӧзек	N ;
ӧӧр:ӧӧр	N ;
паар:паар	N ;
пазытпах:пазытпах	N ;
палығ:палығ	N ;
паро:паро	N ;
пастыра:пастыра	N ;
педучилище:педучилище	N ;
пиденек:пиденек	N ;
пичел:пичел	N ;
пірес:пірес	N ;
плотина:плотина	N ;
позиция:позиция	N ;
полька:полька	N ;
портье:портье	N ;
пӧбейке:пӧбейке	N ;
придаточнай:придаточнай	N ;
пропеллер:пропеллер	N ;
пуйбан:пуйбан	N ;
пусхунӌах:пусхунӌах	N ;
пӱрее:пӱрее	N ;
пыро:пыро	N ;
расписание:расписание	N ;
романтизм:романтизм	N ;
сабыр:сабыр	N ;
сазаалаан:сазаалаан	N ;
салғай:салғай	N ;
сандол:сандол	N ;
сарбазан:сарбазан	N ;
састығ:састығ	N ;
сееребес:сееребес	N ;
сепаратор:сепаратор	N ;
сиг:сиг	N ;
сизіркес:сизіркес	N ;
синоптик:синоптик	N ;
ситкім:ситкім	N ;
сірлес:сірлес	N ;
собес:собес	N ;
сом:сом	N ;
сорға:сорға	N ;
сочинение:сочинение	N ;
сӧртілӌек:сӧртілӌек	N ;
статуэтка:статуэтка	N ;
субъективизм:субъективизм	N ;
сурлаңма:сурлаңма	N ;
сӱлейке:сӱлейке	N ;
сӱрӱм:сӱрӱм	N ;
сыбыхтас:сыбыхтас	N ;
сыларчых:сыларчых	N ;
сыңзыс:сыңзыс	N ;
сысханды:сысханды	N ;
табығлар:табығлар	N ;
тайаныс:тайаныс	N ;
талбытчы:талбытчы	N ;
таңах:таңах	N ;
тарлығыс:тарлығыс	N ;
тахал:тахал	N ;
телевещание:телевещание	N ;
террорист:террорист	N ;
тилідіс:тилідіс	N ;
тирмеліг:тирмеліг	N ;
тіленӌік:тіленӌік	N ;
тоғырхы:тоғырхы	N ;
тонағлығ:тонағлығ	N ;
топ-тоха:топ-тоха	N ;
тот:тот	N ;
тӧӧ:тӧӧ	N ;
тревога:тревога	N ;
тудызаачы:тудызаачы	N ;
турғанӌа:турғанӌа	N ;
тӱген:тӱген	N ;
тӱрілӌек:тӱрілӌек	N ;
тымых:тымых	N ;
тыхтағ-пӱдіріг:тыхтағ-пӱдіріг	N ;
удур-тӧдір:удур-тӧдір	N ;
уламастығ:уламастығ	N ;
ураннығ:ураннығ	N ;
ух:ух	N ;
ӱдӱре:ӱдӱре	N ;
ӱрбе:ӱрбе	N ;
ӱӱлес:ӱӱлес	N ;
физиология:физиология	N ;
форточка:форточка	N ;
хабуғ:хабуғ	N ;
хазан-тімел:хазан-тімел	N ;
хайнама:хайнама	N ;
халғайах:халғайах	N ;
ханатхы:ханатхы	N ;
хара:хара	N ; ! I think this is supposed to be an adjective... (it means black)
харлаңа:харлаңа	N ;
хасхыс:хасхыс	N ;
хлопок:хлопок	N ;
хоккей:хоккей	N ;
хоорай:хоорай	N ;
хорыхпас:хорыхпас	N ;
хуйаң:хуйаң	N ;
хурбу:хурбу	N ;
хыбланыстығ:хыбланыстығ	N ;
хыйғас:хыйғас	N ;
хылӌыхтаныстығ:хылӌыхтаныстығ	N ;
хыринзар:хыринзар	N ;
хысхын:хысхын	N ;
цыган:цыган	N ;
чағыс:чағыс	N ;
чайзаң:чайзаң	N ;
чаллағ:чаллағ	N ;
чапых:чапых	N ;
чарым:чарым	N ;
чачыланаачы:чачыланаачы	N ;
чидектіг:чидектіг	N ;
чирдегі:чирдегі	N ;
чіксеечі:чіксеечі	N ;
чол:чол	N ;
чохсағ:чохсағ	N ;
чӧрісчі:чӧрісчі	N ;
чухаан:чухаан	N ;
чӱрексірӧс:чӱрексірӧс	N ;
чылӌых:чылӌых	N ;
чыылығ:чыылығ	N ;
шинель:шинель	N ;
штат:штат	N ;
ылаа:ылаа	N ;
ырда-кӧгде:ырда-кӧгде	N ;
эдереен:эдереен	N ;
электростанция:электростанция	N ;
эсер:эсер	N ;
юкагир:юкагир	N ;
теер̲ахсах:теер̲ахсах	N ;
бондарев:бондарев	N ;
наныхчул:наныхчул	N ;
тастӱп:тастӱп	N ;
чарыш:чарыш	N ;
беренжак:беренжак	N ;
